src/scripts/Slovak/gpos.foma
# Copyright (C) 2022 Darko Milosevic <daremc86@gmail.com>
# Copyright (C) 2023 Peter Vagner <pvagner@pvagner.tk>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define Conjunction 
a | 
i | 
aj | 
ba | 
aby | 
ale | 
že | 
pretože | 
keď | 
keďže | 
až | 
pokým | 
dokiaľ | 
no | 
predsa | 
keby | 
alebo | 
či | 
buď | 
preto | 
ani | 
než;

define Preposition 
bez | 
blízko | 
do | 
od | 
dolu | 
hore | 
okolo | 
kolo | 
vôkol | 
uprostred | 
vinou | 
koncom | 
pri | 
popri | 
cez | 
vedľa | 
z | 
zo | 
k | 
ku | 
kvôli | 
proti | 
napriek | 
voči | 
na | 
o | 
pre | 
v | 
vo | 
medzi | 
mimo | 
pomedzi | 
spomedzi | 
nad | 
namiesto | 
naproti | 
okrem | 
po | 
pod | 
spod | 
ponad | 
sponad | 
popod | 
poza | 
spoza | 
s | 
so | 
za;

define Particle 
nie | 
lebo | 
nuž | 
kiež | 
bodaj | 
budiž | 
azda | 
nech | 
však | 
by | 
iba | 
ešte | 
sotva | 
asi | 
čo | 
áno;

define Personal 
ja | 
ty | 
on | 
ona | 
ono | 
my | 
vy | 
oni | 
ony;

define Possessive 
môj | 
moja | 
moje | 
tvoj | 
tvoja | 
tvoje | 
jeho | 
jej | 
náš | 
naša | 
naše | 
váš | 
vaša | 
vaše | 
ich;

define FunctionWord Conjunction | Preposition | Particle | Personal | Possessive;

regex 
Conjunction -> conj || _ ,, 
Preposition -> prep || _ ,, 
Particle -> part || _ ,, 
Personal -> pers || _ ,, 
Possessive -> pos || _ ,, 
\FunctionWord -> content || _ ; 
